Utah statutes.
53B-2a-102.   President -- Appointment -- Duties.
(1) (a)  The board of trustees shall appoint a president for the Utah College
of Applied Technology.
(b)  The president of the Utah College of Applied Technology does not need to
have a doctorate degree, but shall have extensive experience in career and
technical education.
(c)  The president shall serve at the board of trustees' discretion.
(d)  The names of the final candidates for president of the Utah College of
Applied Technology shall be publicly disclosed.
(2)  The president shall:
(a)  direct the Utah College of Applied Technology and coordinate the
activities of each of its college campuses;
(b)  in consultation with the board of trustees, campus presidents, and campus
boards of directors, prepare a comprehensive strategic plan for delivering
career and technical education through the Utah College of Applied Technology
college campuses;
(c)  after consulting with school districts, charter schools, and other higher
education institutions in the regions, ensure that the curricula of the Utah
College of Applied Technology meet the needs of the state, the regions, the
school districts, and charter schools;
(d)  in consultation with the board of trustees, campus presidents, and campus
boards of directors, and after consulting with school districts, charter
schools, and other higher education institutions in the region, develop
strategies for providing career and technical education in rural areas,
specifically considering the distances between rural career and technical
education providers;
(e)  establish minimum standards for career and technical education programs
of the Utah College of Applied Technology college campuses;
(f)  in conjunction with the board of trustees, do the following:
(i)  develop and implement a system of common definitions, standards, and
criteria for tracking and measuring the effectiveness of career and technical
education;
(ii)  maintain a central administration office for coordination,
prioritization, support, and reporting of college functions dealing with:
(A)  budgets and audits;
(B)  facilities, including capital, capital development, and leases;
(C)  management information systems;
(D)  campus and college master planning efforts;
(E)  strategic planning;
(F)  articulation with institutions of higher education and public education;
(G)  legislative, State System of Public Education, State System of Higher
Education, and Board of Regents contact;
(H)  general data collection; and
(I)  programs, certificates, and curriculum; and
(iii)  develop and implement a plan to inform citizens about the availability,
cost, and advantages of career and technical education;
(g)  after consulting with the State Board of Education, school districts, and
charter schools, ensure that secondary students in the public education system
have access to career and technical education through the Utah College of
Applied Technology college campuses;
(h)  in conjunction with the board of trustees, establish benchmarks, provide
oversight, evaluate program performance, and obtain independent audits to
ensure that college campuses follow the non-credit career and technical
education mission described in this part; and
(i)  with the approval of the board of trustees, appoint campus presidents in
accordance with Section 53B-2a-107 and set their compensation annually.
